Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Article 4. Commercial Motor Vehicle Requirements.

Sec. 19.10.300.
Financial responsibility.

A person who carries passengers, freight for hire intrastate in a commercial motor vehicle, a person who carries freight in a motor vehicle for commercial purposes, or a person who rents or leases a motor vehicle for the use of another to carry freight shall procure and maintain security in the following minimum amounts:

$200,000 for property damage in a single occurrence;

$500,000 for bodily injury or death in a single occurrence.

Evidence of security required under (a) of this section shall be filed with the department and must be

a policy or certificate of insurance issued by an insurer acceptable to the department;

a bond of a surety company licensed to write surety bonds in the state;

evidence accepted by the department, showing ability to self-insure; or

other security approved by the department.

The department shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. The department may authorize department personnel to enforce this section and may adopt procedural regulations necessary to implement this section.

A policy of insurance, surety bond, or other form of security may not be canceled on less than 30 days’ written notice to the department. This requirement must be clearly stated in the policy or endorsement for an insurance policy submitted as proof of financial responsibility under (b)(1) of this section. The 30-day notice period is measured from the date on which the department receives notice.

When operating a commercial motor vehicle or motor vehicle for which security is required under (a) of this section, a person shall carry proof of insurance and, if involved in an accident with another person, shall display the proof of insurance to the other person. In this subsection, “proof of insurance” means a

certificate of self-insurance acceptable to the department;

card issued by an insurer described in (b)(1) of this section that indicates that insurance has been procured as required by this section, that contains a local or toll-free telephone number for filing or receiving claim information, and that indicates the name and address of the insurer; or

copy of the surety bond described in (b)(2) of this section.

Notwithstanding AS

19.10.399

, in this section

“commercial motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle or a combination of a motor vehicle and one or more other vehicles

used to transport passengers or property for commercial purposes;

used on a land highway or vehicular way or area;

that

has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross combination weight rating greater than 26,000 pounds; or

is designed to transport more than 15 passengers, including the driver; and

except that the following vehicles meeting the criteria in (A) — (C) of this paragraph are not commercial motor vehicles:

emergency or fire equipment that is necessary to the preservation of life or property;

covered farm vehicles operating anywhere in the state; and

vehicles used exclusively for purposes other than commercial purposes;

“freight” means commodities, articles, and cargo, of whatever nature or value.

A person who violates (a) of this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not less than $500 or more than $1,000.

History.

(E.O. No. 98 § 4 (1997); am § 1 ch 48 SLA 1998; am § 12 ch 33 SLA 1999; am § 2 ch 4 SLA 2013; am § 1 ch 76 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (e) was enacted as (g).
Relettered in 1998, at which time former subsection (e) was relettered as (g). In 2008, in (f)(1)(C), “49 U.S.C. 5101 — 5128” was substituted for “49 U.S.C. 5101 — 5127” to reflect the renumbering of 49 U.S.C. 5127.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 8, 2013, in (f)(a)(1), added “for commercial purposes” at the end of (A), deleted (C)(iii), and made stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendment, effective November 4, 2018, in (f)(1)(B), added “or area” at the end, rewrote (f)(1)(D)(ii), which read, “farm vehicles that are controlled and operated by a farmer; used to transport agricultural products, farm machinery, or farm supplies to or from that farmer’s farm; not used in the operations of a common or contract motor carrier; and used within 150 miles of the farmer’s farm”, and made related changes.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 76, SLA 2018 (SB 163), see 2018 Senate Journal 1833 — 1834.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The reference to “intrastate” in subsection (a) limits the applicability of the insurance requirements, excluding “interstate” commercial vehicles which are operating in Alaska.
February 19, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen. (issued under former AS

28.33.010

).

Insurance must be maintained at all times on a tractor truck. If the truck owner works out an arrangement with his lessee in which the lessee will purchase insurance in the requisite amounts, this would be satisfactory under the statute, since the intent is to require all trucks to be insured.
However, if the lessee fails to procure or maintain insurance, the statute will place the responsibility for this failure on the owner. February 19, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen. (issued under former AS

28.33.010

).

Collateral references. —

Combining or stacking uninsured motorist coverages provided in fleet policy. 25 ALR4th 896.

Sec. 19.10.310.
Commercial motor vehicle safety inspections.

A commercial motor vehicle may not be operated without a certificate of inspection. An owner or operator of a commercial motor vehicle shall renew a certificate of inspection at least annually. An owner or operator of a commercial motor vehicle shall provide proof of annual inspection upon demand of a peace officer or employee of the department authorized by the commissioner to enforce this section.

History.

(E.O. No. 98 § 4 (1997); am § 2 ch 48 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For commercial motor vehicles: safety and hazardous materials, see 17 AAC 25, art. 2.

Secs. 19.10.320,
19.10.330.
Commercial motor vehicle inspection station permits; certification of commercial motor vehicle inspectors. [Repealed, § 21 ch 48 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 19.10.340.
Issuance of certificate of inspection.

A person conducting annual commercial motor vehicle inspections shall issue a certificate of inspection to the owner or operator after determining that the motor vehicle is in a safe and mechanically sound condition as required by law. The owner or operator of a commercial motor vehicle shall keep a record of the annual inspection of the vehicle.

History.

(E.O. No. 98 § 4 (1997); am § 3 ch 48 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For commercial motor vehicles: safety and hazardous materials, see 17 AAC 25, art. 2.

Secs. 19.10.350,
19.10.360.
Falsely representing to be an official station; counterfeit certificates of inspection. [Repealed, § 21 ch 48 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 19.10.370.
Regulations.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations to implement AS

19.10.310

—

19.10.399

.

History.

(E.O. No. 98 § 4 (1997); am § 4 ch 48 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For commercial motor vehicles: safety and hazardous materials, see 17 AAC 25, art. 2.

Sec. 19.10.375.
Impoundment.

If a peace officer or an employee of the department authorized by the commissioner to issue citations finds a commercial motor vehicle in operation without a current and valid certificate of inspection under this chapter, the commercial motor vehicle may be impounded. The commercial motor vehicle may not be released from impoundment until

a current and valid certificate of inspection under this chapter has been provided for the commercial motor vehicle; and

any impoundment fees or charges have been paid.

The department may adopt regulations to charge fees to recover costs of implementation of this section, including costs of impoundment.

History.

(§ 5 ch 48 SLA 1998)

Sec. 19.10.380.
Criminal penalty.

A person who violates a provision of AS

19.10.310

—

19.10.399

is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(E.O. No. 98 § 4 (1997))

Cross references. —

For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 19.10.399.
Definitions.

In AS

19.10.300

—

19.10.399

,

“commercial motor vehicle” means a self-propelled or towed motor vehicle

used to transport passengers or property for commercial purposes;

used on a highway or vehicular way or area;

that

has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross combination weight rating, or gross vehicle weight or gross combination weight, of 10,001 pounds or more for vehicles used in interstate commerce and 14,000 pounds or more for vehicles used in intrastate commerce;

is designed to transport more than 15 passengers, including the driver; or

is used to transport material found by the United States Secretary of Transportation to be hazardous under 49 U.S.C. 5103 and is transported in any quantity requiring placarding; and

for the purposes of intrastate commerce; the following vehicles meeting the criteria in (A) and (B) and either (C)(i) or (ii) of this paragraph are not commercial motor vehicles:

emergency or fire equipment that is necessary to the preservation of life or property;

covered farm vehicles operating anywhere in the state;

school buses used for school bus operations;

vehicles owned and operated by the federal government unless the vehicle is used to transport property of the general public for compensation in competition with other persons who own or operate a commercial motor vehicle subject to AS

19.10.310

—

19.10.399

, and except to the extent that regulation of vehicles operated by the federal government is permitted by federal law; and

vehicles used exclusively for purposes other than commercial purposes;

“commercial purposes” means activities for which a person receives direct monetary compensation or activities for which a person receives no direct monetary compensation but that are incidental to and done in furtherance of the person’s business;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of transportation and public facilities;

“covered farm vehicle” means a straight or articulated vehicle

registered in the state with a license plate or other designation issued by the state that allows law enforcement officials to identify it as a farm vehicle;

operated by the owner or operator of a farm or ranch, or an employee or family member of an owner or operator of a farm or ranch;

used to transport agricultural commodities, livestock, machinery, or supplies to or from a farm or ranch; and

not used in for-hire motor carrier operations;

“department” means the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities;

“gross combination weight rating” means the value specified by the manufacturer as the loaded weight of a combination vehicle, except that if a value has not been specified by the manufacturer, the gross combination weight rating is determined by adding the gross vehicle weight rating of the power unit and the total weight of the towed unit and the load on the towed unit;

“gross vehicle weight rating” means the value specified by the manufacturer as the loaded weight of a single vehicle;

“highway” means the entire width between the boundary lines of every way that is publicly maintained when a part of it is open to the public for purposes of vehicular travel, including but not limited to every street and the Alaska state marine highway system but not vehicular ways or areas;

“motor vehicle” means a vehicle that is self-propelled except a vehicle moved by human or animal power;

“official traffic-control device” means a sign, signal, marking, or other device not inconsistent with AS 28, placed or erected by authority of a state or municipal agency or official having jurisdiction, for the purpose of traffic regulating, warning, and guiding;

“owner” means a person, other than a lienholder, having the property in or title to a vehicle, including but not limited to a person entitled to the use and possession of a vehicle subject to a security interest in another person, but exclusive of a lessee under a lease not intended as security;

“school bus” means a passenger motor vehicle that is designed or used to carry more than 10 passengers in addition to the driver and that is likely to be used to transport pre-elementary, elementary, or secondary school students to and from school;

“school bus operations” means the use of a school bus to transport students and school personnel to and from school;

“traffic” means pedestrians, ridden or herded animals, vehicles, and other conveyances either singly or together while using a highway or vehicular way or area that is open to public use for purposes of travel;

“vehicle” means a device in, upon, or by which a person or property may be transported or drawn upon or immediately over a highway or vehicular way or area; “vehicle” does not include

devices used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks;

mobile homes;

“vehicular way or area” means a way, path, or area, other than a highway or private property, that is designated by official traffic control devices or customary usage and that is open to the public for purposes of pedestrian or vehicular travel, and which way or area may be restricted in use to pedestrians, bicycles, or other specific types of vehicles as determined by the Department of Public Safety or other agency having jurisdiction over the way, path, or area.

History.

(E.O. No. 98 § 4 (1997); am § 6 ch 48 SLA 1998; am § 13 ch 33 SLA 1999; am § 3 ch 4 SLA 2013; am §§ 2, 3 ch 76 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2008, in (1)(C), “49 U.S.C. 5101 — 5128” was substituted for “49 U.S.C. 5101 — 5127” to reflect the renumbering of
49 U.S.C. 5127.

In 2018, this section was reorganized to maintain alphabetical order.

Administrative Code. —

For commercial motor vehicles: safety and hazardous materials, see 17 AAC 25, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 8, 2013, in (1)(C)(i), added “for vehicles used in interstate commerce and 14,000 pounds for vehicles used in intrastate commerce”, deleted (1)(C)(iii), and made stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendment, effective November 4, 2018, in (1), substituted “towed motor vehicle” for “towed vehicle” in the introductory language, in (1)(B) added “or area” at the end, in (1)(C)(i), substituted “, or gross vehicle weight or gross combination weight, of 10,001 pounds or more” for “greater than 10,000 pounds” following “gross combination weight rating”, and inserted “or more” following “14,000 pounds”, added (1)(C)(iii), in the introductory language in (1)(D), substituted “for the purposes of intrastate commerce the following vehicles meeting the criteria in (A) and (B) and either (C)(i) or (ii) of this paragraph are not commercial motor vehicles” for “except that the following vehicles meeting the criteria in (A) – (C) of this paragraph are not commercial motor vehicles”, rewrote (1)(D)(ii), which read, “farm vehicles that are controlled and operated by a farmer; used to transport agricultural products, farm machinery, or farm supplies to or from that farmer’s farm; not used in the operations of a common or contract motor carrier; and used within 150 miles of the farmer’s farm”, in (1)(D)(iii), added “used for school bus operations” at the end; added (14) [now (4)], (15) [now (12)], and (16) [now (13)].

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 76, SLA 2018 (SB 163), see 2018 Senate Journal 1833 — 1834.